Washington statutes.
RCW 7.56.130

Costs.

When an information is filed by the prosecuting attorney, he or she shall not be liable for the costs, but when it is filed upon the relation of a private person such person shall be liable for costs unless the same are adjudged against the defendant.

[ 2011 c 336 s 243; Code 1881 s 714; 1877 p 145 s 718; 1854 p 218 s 481; RRS s 1046.]